Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.050

Rendering plant license fee.

Any person engaged in operating a rendering plant shall secure from the director an annual rendering plant license and pay an annual fee of one hundred dollars: PROVIDED, That no license shall be required to operate a rendering plant on the premises of a licensed slaughtering establishment maintaining state or federal meat inspection unless said rendering plant receives dead animals that have been transported on public highways.

[ 1949 c 100 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-5.]